Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.185

Right to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation from time to time in any and as many respects as may be desired, so long as its articles of incorporation as amended contain only such provisions as are lawful under this chapter. A member or shareholder of a corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation.

[ 2001 c 271 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 37.]